Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.380

Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account.

The Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 44.04.370 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of the legislative page scholarship program in RCW 44.04.370. Only the secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of the house of representatives or their designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2017 c 322 s 3.]